Hawaii statutes.
§183-3 Administrator. The board shall:

(1) Appoint an administrator of forestry and
wildlife, hereinafter called "administrator", who shall have charge,
direction, and control (subject to the direction and control of the board) of
all matters relating to forestry and wildlife management under title 12 and
such other matters as the board may direct. The administrator shall be trained
and educated in natural resource management;

(2) Appoint and remove foresters and wildlife
biologists and such other persons as the board may employ. [L 1903, c 44, pt of
§5; am L 1915, c 136, §4; RL 1925, pt of §586; am L 1927, c 54, §3; am L 1931,
c 34, §1; RL 1935, pt of §176; RL 1945, pt of §1006; RL 1955, §18-9; am L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §1; HRS §183-3; am L 1975, c 111, §1; am L
1980, c 18, §1; am L 1981, c 85, §5]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next